Alaska statutes. Title 21. Insurance.
Article 8. Independent Adjusters.

Sec. 21.27.830.
Independent adjuster qualifications.

In addition to the general qualifications under AS

21.27.020

, to qualify for issuance or renewal of an independent adjuster license, an applicant or licensee shall

have at least six months active working experience within the previous two calendar years as either an independent adjuster trainee, an insurance producer, a managing general agent, a reinsurance intermediary broker, a reinsurance intermediary manager, a surplus lines broker, an independent adjuster, or an underwriter or claims adjuster employee of an insurer, and, in the director’s opinion, exhibit the ability to competently perform the responsibilities of an independent adjuster; or

have been previously licensed in good standing in this state as an independent adjuster within the previous four calendar years and not have had a license suspended or revoked.

History.

(§ 94 ch 67 SLA 1992)

Sec. 21.27.840.
Trainee independent adjusters.

An individual resident who does not have the experience with reference to the handling of loss claims but who otherwise meets the requirements of AS

21.27.830

, may be employed by a licensed independent adjuster as a trainee independent adjuster, subject to the provisions of this section.

Before the individual may handle loss claims, the licensed independent adjuster employing the trainee independent adjuster shall submit to the director the application of the trainee independent adjuster, with the fee set under AS

21.06.250

, and receive the trainee independent adjuster license.

The director shall revoke a trainee independent adjuster license unless the individual has

not later than four months after the effective date of the trainee adjuster license, complied with the independent adjuster licensing requirements of AS

21.27.060

concerning the insurance laws and regulations of this state;

not later than eight months after the effective date of the trainee adjuster license, complied with the independent adjuster licensing requirements of AS

21.27.060

concerning the knowledge and competence of the licensee concerning handling of loss claims and the licensee’s duties and responsibilities as a licensee; and

within 12 months after the effective date of the trainee adjuster license, complied with all other independent adjuster licensing requirements.

A person whose trainee independent adjuster license was revoked for failure to meet a requirement of (c) of this section may submit a new application for a trainee independent adjuster license after the person has successfully passed both tests required under (c) of this section.

Upon satisfying the requirements of (c) of this section, a trainee independent adjuster shall apply within 30 days for an independent adjuster license.

A trainee independent adjuster shall at all times be working at the direction and under the supervision of the employing licensed independent adjuster, and the file and record documentation shall reflect the direction and supervision. The employing licensed independent adjuster and its firm, and the compliance officer, if any, are responsible for all insurance actions of the trainee independent adjuster.

A trainee independent adjuster is restricted to participation in a factual investigation and a tentative closing of a loss subject to review and final determination by the employing licensed independent adjuster, and file and record documentation shall reflect compliance with this subsection.

A trainee independent adjuster may not participate in a factual investigation and a tentative closing of a loss away from the place of business unless a licensed independent adjuster physically accompanies the trainee.

In addition to any other penalty provided by law,

a trainee independent adjuster who the director determines has violated the provisions of this section shall have its license terminated; a licensee or other person having possession or custody of the license shall within 30 days surrender the license to the director either personally or by certified mail;

if the director determines under AS

21.06.170

—

21.06.240

that the employing licensed independent adjuster knew of or should have known that a trainee independent adjuster violated this section, the employing licensed independent adjuster and firm, and the compliance officer, if any, are subject to the penalties provided under AS

21.27.440

.

History.

(§ 94 ch 67 SLA 1992; am §§ 63, 64 ch 81 SLA 2001)

Sec. 21.27.850.
Insurance producer, managing general agent, surplus lines broker, reinsurance intermediary broker, and reinsurance intermediary manager as independent adjuster.

Without being required by this chapter to be licensed also as an independent adjuster

a licensed insurance producer and a licensed managing general agent, incidental to acting as an insurance producer, may act as an adjuster and investigate, adjust, and report upon claims on behalf of and as authorized by an admitted insurer that has appointed the insurance producer or the managing general agent as its agent under AS

21.27.100

;

a surplus lines broker may act as an adjuster and investigate, adjust, and report upon claims on behalf of and as authorized by a nonadmitted insurer; and

a reinsurance intermediary broker or a reinsurance intermediary manager may act as an adjuster and investigate, adjust, and report upon claims on behalf of and as authorized by an insurer or reinsurer under the contract required by this chapter.

History.

(§ 94 ch 67 SLA 1992)

Collateral references. —

Insurer’s tort liability for acts of adjuster seeking to obtain settlement or release. 39 ALR3d 739.

Sec. 21.27.860.
Unlicensed nonresident adjusters.

A nonresident independent adjuster not licensed by this state who is licensed by and in good standing with its resident state may act as an adjuster and adjust a single loss in this state during a calendar year, or may act as an adjuster and adjust losses arising out of a catastrophe as declared by the director, if, within 10 days after the start of an investigation or adjustment under this section, the nonresident independent adjuster has advised the director in writing of the adjustment and provided the following information:

the individual and firm name;

the business mailing address;

the business physical address and phone number;

the licensing state of residence;

the resident license number; and

other facts that the director may require.

A nonresident independent adjuster may be sued upon a cause of action arising in this state arising from an adjustment under this section under the procedure provided in AS 21.33.

History.

(§ 94 ch 67 SLA 1992)

Sec. 21.27.870.
Independent adjuster records.

In addition to any other records requirements under this chapter, an independent adjuster shall maintain in organized form a complete record of each investigation or adjustment undertaken or consummated, and a statement of the fee, commission, or other compensation received or to be received by the adjuster on account of the investigation or adjustment.

History.

(§ 94 ch 67 SLA 1992)